Utah statutes.
77-30-6.   Extradition for crime committed in another state by person while in this state.

The governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in such other state, in the manner provided in section 77-30-3, with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand, and the provisions of this act not otherwise inconsistent shall apply to such cases even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime, and has not fled therefrom.

